Massachusetts, session 194th, H2200.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 24A of chapter 94C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (c) the following subsection:-
(c½) The department shall establish, by rule or regulation, a process by which to include
information about the administration of opioid maintenance treatment in the prescription
monitoring program, when the inclusion of such information does not conflict with state or
federal privacy rules. The purpose of this subsection shall be to ensure that licensed professionals
authorized to prescribe controlled substances receive information, through utilization of the
prescription monitoring program, about an individual patient’s participation in opioid
maintenance treatment prior to issuing a new prescription for an opioid substance other than the
substance used for opioid maintenance treatment.
SECTION 2. Section 18 of chapter 111E of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following subsection:-
of 2

(a½) For each facility that is an opioid treatment program, as defined under 42 CFR Part
8, the facility shall present to each individual entering treatment a form that allows the individual
to consent to the release of information, through the prescription monitoring program, about the
administration of opioid maintenance treatment at the facility. Said consent form shall be
accompanied by information clearly explaining that such consent is not required but is
encouraged to improve coordination of services; and by information on how the individual may
complete and return the form to the facility or to the department of public health if they elect to
give such consent. A record of the individual’s election relative to this form shall be maintained
by the facility as part of the record of treatment required by this section. The same form and
information shall be presented to the individual upon their discharge from the facility.
of 2